Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 5 Release

13-4-80.
Release of another bound jointly or primarily or acceptance of higher security for same debt.

A release may result by operation of law. When a creditor releases another who is bound jointly with or primarily to a debtor or accepts from a debtor a higher security for the same debt, not intended to be collateral thereto, a release results by operation of law.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2803; Code 1868, § 2811; Code 1873, § 2862; Code 1882, § 2862; Civil Code 1895, § 3715; Civil Code 1910, § 4309; Code 1933, § 20-910.

13-4-81.
Covenant not to sue; bond to indemnify debtor against debt.

A covenant never to sue is equivalent to a release as is a bond to indemnify a debtor against his own debt.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2802; Code 1868, § 2810; Code 1873, § 2861; Code 1882, § 2861; Civil Code 1895, § 3714; Civil Code 1910, § 4308; Code 1933, § 20-909.

13-4-82.
Intermarriage of parties.

Intermarriage of the parties generally releases a debt created prior to marriage. However, intermarriage of the parties shall not release a debt arising from an antenuptial agreement, as such term is defined in Code Section 19-3-60.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2804; Code 1868, § 2812; Code 1873, § 2863; Code 1882, § 2863; Civil Code 1895, § 3716; Civil Code 1910, § 4310; Code 1933, § 20-911; Ga. L. 2018, p. 155, § 2-1/HB 190.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the second sentence, substituted “parties shall” for “parties does” in the middle and substituted “agreement, as such term is defined in Code Section 19-3-60” for “contract” at the end.